Alabama, session 2026rs, SB140.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF ALABAMA:
Section 1. Section 12-15-217 of the Code of Alabama
1975, is amended to read as follows:
"§12-15-217
(a)(1) Notwithstanding subsection (a) of Section
12-15-133(a), written notice that if a child, believed to be
enrolled in a school, kindergarten to grade 12, has been found
charged with or adjudicated to be delinquent by a juvenile
court of an act which if committed by an adult would be a
Class A or B felony or any other crime, at the discretion of a
capital offense pursuant to Section 13A-5-40, murder pursuant
to Section 13A-6-2, rape in the first degree pursuant to
Section 13A-6-61, or sodomy in the first degree pursuant to
Section 13A-6-63, the juvenile court, shall be provided
provide written notice within seven days after the charge or
adjudication of delinquency to the superintendent of the
Page 2

adjudication of delinquency to the superintendent of the
SB140 INTRODUCED
school district of attendance, or, if the child attends a
private school, to the principal of the school.
(2) Notwithstanding Section 12-15-133(a), if a child,
believed to be enrolled in a school, kindergarten to grade 12,
has been charged with or adjudicated to be delinquent by a
juvenile court of any act which if committed by an adult would
be a crime, other than those outlined in subdivision (1), the
juvenile court may provide written notice within seven days
after the charge or adjudication of delinquency to the
superintendent of the school district of attendance, or, if
the child attends a private school, to the principal of the
school.
(3) The juvenile court shall provide the notice using
whatever method it deems appropriate or otherwise as decided
by the Administrative Office of Courts. The prosecutor may
recommend to the juvenile court that notice be given to the
school for any delinquent act.
(4) Written notice shall include only the offenses,
enumerated by the appropriate code section and brief
description, found to have been committed by the child and the
disposition of the case involving the child.
(5) Where applicable, this notice shall may be
expeditiously transmitted by the district superintendent to
the principal at the school of attendance. The principal shall
may disseminate the information to those counselors directly
supervising or reporting on the behavior or progress of the
child. In addition, the principal may disseminate the
information to any teacher, administrator, or other school
Page 3

information to any teacher, administrator, or other school
SB140 INTRODUCED
employee directly supervising or reporting on the behavior or
progress of the child whom the principal believes needs the
information to work with the pupil child in appropriate
fashion or to protect other students and staff.
(b) Any information received by a teacher, counselor,
administrator, or other school employee pursuant to this
section shall be received in confidence for the limited
purpose of rehabilitating the child and protecting students
and staff, and shall not be further disseminated by the
teacher, counselor, or administrator, except insofar as where
communication with the child, his or her parent, legal
guardian, legal custodian, law enforcement personnel, and the
juvenile probation officer of the child is necessary to
effectuate the rehabilitation of rehabilitate the child or to
protect students and staff.
100 (c) An intentional violation of the confidentiality
101 provisions of this section is a Class A misdemeanor under the
102 jurisdiction of the juvenile court."
103 Section 2. This act shall become effective on October
104 1, 2026.
Page 4